Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3527
Violations; penalty.

Any person who (1) permits unauthorized direct access to criminal history record information, (2) knowingly fails to disseminate or make public criminal history record information of official acts as required under sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423, or (3) knowingly disseminates nondisclosable criminal history record information in violation of sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423, shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 30.